District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1005

Priority for recycling.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 6, 36 DCR 595
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
1981 Ed., § 6-3405.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-226, the “D.C. Solid Waste Management & Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-160, July 20, 1989.